Massachusetts, session 194th, S529.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 1F the following section:-
Section 1G. Every citizen 16 or 17 years of age who is a resident in the city or town
where they claim the right to vote at the time they register and who has complied with the
requirements of this chapter shall have their name entered on the list of voters in a city or town
accepting this section in the manner provided in section 4 of chapter 4 and may vote therein in
any election for officers in such city or town.
of 1